Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.511

Individual certification not required.

Individual worker certification is not required for work under this subchapter. This subchapter does not preclude any person performing telecommunications work from obtaining a limited energy credit towards an electrical certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the certification requirements under this chapter that are applicable to electrical installations.

[ 2000 c 238 s 215.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.